Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 30. Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.

Cross references. —

For child custody generally, see AS

25.20.060

—

25.20.140

; for judgments for custody in divorce actions, see AS

25.24.150

.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 7, ch. 133, SLA 1998, “a motion or other request for relief that was made before September 23, 1998 is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made if the motion or other request was made in a child custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination.”